Hawaii statutes.
§624-45 Costs. The applicant or
plaintiff shall pay all costs of all proceedings under section 624-41, but such
disbursements ultimately may be allowed in taxation of costs as in the case of
disbursements for depositions. [L 1876, c 32, §31; RL 1925, §2594; RL 1935,
§3888; RL 1945, §9874; RL 1955, §223-27; HRS §624-45; am L 1972, c 143, §1(i)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next